Mississippi, session 2026, SB2108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 83-39-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-39-3.  (1)  No person shall act in the capacity of professional bail agent, soliciting bail agent or bail enforcement agent, as defined in Section 83-39-1, or perform any of the functions, duties or powers of the same unless that person shall be qualified and licensed as provided in this chapter.  The terms of this chapter shall not apply to any automobile club or association, financial institution, insurance company or other organization or association or their employees who execute bail bonds on violations arising out of the use of a motor vehicle by their members, policyholders or borrowers when bail bond is not the principal benefit of membership, the policy of insurance or of a loan to such member, policyholder or borrower. (2)  (a)  No license shall be issued or renewed except in compliance with this chapter, and none shall be issued except to an individual.  No firm, partnership, association or corporation, as such, shall be so licensed.  No professional bail agent shall operate under more than one (1) trade name.  A soliciting bail agent and bail enforcement agent shall operate only under the professional bail agent's name. No license shall be issued to or renewed for any person who has ever been convicted of a crime that the commissioner finds directly relates to the duties and responsibilities of the business of a professional bail agent, soliciting bail agent, or bail enforcement agent, including, but not limited to, any felony that involves an act of fraud, dishonesty, or a breach of trust, or money laundering.  No license shall be issued to any person who is under twenty-one (21) years of age.  No person engaged as a law enforcement or judicial official or attorney shall be licensed hereunder.  A person who is employed in any capacity at any jail or corrections facility that houses state, county or municipal inmates who are or may be eligible for bail, whether the person is a public employee, independent contractor, or the employee of an independent contractor, may not be licensed under this section. (b)  (i)  No person who is a relative of either a sworn state, county or municipal law enforcement official or judicial official, or an employee, independent contractor or the contractor's employee of any police department, sheriff's department, jail or corrections facility that houses or holds federal, state, county or municipal inmates who are or may be eligible for bail, shall write a bond in the county where the law enforcement entity or court in which the person's relative serves is located.  "Relative" means a spouse, parent, grandparent, child, sister, brother, or a consanguineous aunt, uncle, niece or nephew.  Violation of this prohibition shall result in license revocation. (ii)  No person licensed under this chapter shall act as a personal surety agent in the writing of bail during a period he or she is licensed as a limited surety agent, as defined herein. (iii)  No person licensed under this chapter shall give legal advice or a legal opinion in any form. (3)  The department is vested with the authority to enforce this chapter.  The department may conduct investigations or request other state, county or local officials to conduct investigations and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary for the enforcement of this chapter.  The department may establish monetary fines and collect such fines as necessary for the enforcement of such rules and regulations.  All fines collected shall be deposited in the Special Insurance Department Fund for the operation of that agency. (4)  (a)  Each license issued hereunder shall expire biennially on the last day of September of each odd-numbered year, unless revoked or suspended prior thereto by the department, or upon notice served upon the commissioner by the insurer that the authority of a limited surety agent to act for or on behalf of such insurer had been terminated, or upon notice served upon the commissioner that the authority of a soliciting bail agent or bail enforcement agent had been terminated by such professional bail agent. (b)  A soliciting bail agent or bail enforcement agent may, upon termination by a professional bail agent or upon his cessation of employment with a professional bail agent, be relicensed without having to comply with the provisions of subsection (7)(a) and (b) of this section, if he has held a license in his respective license category within ninety (90) days of the new application, meets all other requirements set forth in Section 83-39-5 and subsection (7)(b) of this section, and notifies the previous professional bail agent in writing that he is submitting an application for a new license. (5)  The department shall prepare and deliver to each licensee a license showing the name, address and classification of the licensee, and shall certify that the person is a licensed professional bail agent, being designated as a personal surety agent or a limited surety agent, a soliciting bail agent or a bail enforcement agent.  In addition, the license of a soliciting bail agent or bail enforcement agent, shall show the name of the professional bail agent and any other information as the commissioner deems proper. (6)  The commissioner, after a hearing under Section 83-39-17, may refuse to issue a privilege license for a soliciting bail agent to change from one (1) professional bail agent to another if he or she owes any premium or debt to the professional bail agent with whom he or she is currently licensed.  The commissioner, after a hearing under Section 83-39-17, shall refuse to issue a license for a limited surety agent if he or she owes any premium or debt to an insurer to which he or she has been appointed.  If a license has been granted to a * * * limited surety agent or a soliciting bail agent who owed any premium or debt to an insurer or professional bail agent professional bail agent, soliciting bail agent or bail enforcement agent and evidence is presented, subsequently, that a court has rendered a civil judgment against that agent because of monies owed to an insurer or professional bail agent for reasons pertaining to his or her employment or termination of employment, the commissioner * * *, after a hearing under Section 83‑39‑17, shall * * * revoke suspend the license until such time as the judgement is satisfied.  After the judgement has been satisfied, a hearing to reinstate the license for the professional bail agent, soliciting bail agent or bail enforcement agent may be requested under Section 83-39-17 and upon presentation of the satisfaction of the judgement, the license may be reinstated. (7)  (a)  Before the issuance of any initial professional bail agent, soliciting bail agent or bail enforcement agent license, the applicant shall submit proof of successful completion of forty (40) hours of prelicensing education approved by the Mississippi Insurance Department unless the applicant is currently licensed under this chapter on July 1, 2014, and has maintained that license in compliance with the continuing education requirements of subsection (8) of this section.  Any applicant who has met all continuing education requirements as set forth in subsection (8)(a) of this section and has been properly licensed under this chapter within ninety (90) days of submitting an application for a license shall not be subject to the prelicensing education requirement. (b)  All applicants for a professional bail agent, soliciting bail agent or bail enforcement agent license applying for an original license after July 1, 2014, shall successfully complete a limited examination by the department for the restricted lines of business before the license can be issued; however, this examination requirement shall not apply to any licensed bail soliciting agent and bail enforcement agent transferring to another professional bail agent license, any licensed bail soliciting agent applying for a bail enforcement agent license, and any licensed bail enforcement agent applying for a bail soliciting agent license.  An applicant shall only be required to successfully complete the limited examination once. (c)  Beginning on July 1, 2011, in order to assist the department in determining an applicant's suitability for a license under this chapter, the applicant shall submit a set of fingerprints with the submission of an application for license.  The department shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of conducting a criminal history record check.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the Department of Public Safety shall forward the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check.  Fees related to the criminal history record check shall be paid by the applicant to the commissioner and the monies from such fees shall be deposited in the special fund in the State Treasury designated as the "Insurance Department Fund." (8)  (a)  Before the renewal of the license of any professional bail agent, soliciting bail agent or bail enforcement agent, the applicant shall submit proof of successful completion of continuing education hours as follows: (i)  There shall be no continuing education required for the first licensure year; (ii)  Except as provided in subparagraph (i), eight (8) hours of continuing education for each year or part of a year of the two-year license period, for a total of sixteen (16) hours per license period. (b)  If an applicant for renewal failed to obtain the required eight (8) hours for each year of the license period during the actual license year in which the education was required to be obtained, the applicant shall not be eligible for a renewal license but shall be required to obtain an original license and be subject to the education requirements set forth in subsection (7).  The commissioner shall not be required to comply with Section 83-39-17 in denying an application for a renewal license under this paragraph (b). (c)  The education hours required under this subsection (8) shall be approved by the Mississippi Insurance Department. (d)  The continuing education requirements under this subsection (8) shall not be required for renewal of a bail agent license for any applicant who is sixty-five (65) years of age and who has been licensed as a bail agent for a continuous period of twenty (20) years immediately preceding the submission of the application as evidenced by submission of an affidavit, under oath, on a form prescribed by the department, signed by the licensee attesting to satisfaction of the age, licensing, and experience requirements of this paragraph (d). (9)  No license as a professional bail agent shall be issued unless the applicant has been duly licensed by the department as a soliciting bail agent for a period of three (3) consecutive years immediately preceding the submission of the application. However, this subsection (9) shall not apply to any person who was licensed as a professional bail agent before July 1, 2011. (10)  A nonresident person may be licensed as a professional bail agent, bail soliciting agent or bail enforcement agent if: (a)  The person's home state awards licenses to residents of this state on the same basis; and (b)  The person has satisfied all requirements set forth in this chapter. (11)  On or before October 1, 2016, the Insurance Department shall establish a statewide Electronic Bondsmen Registry for all licenses, powers of appointment and powers of attorney requiring registration under this section. Once established, each professional bail agent, limited surety agent, bail soliciting agent, bail enforcement agent or insurance company writing bail bonds shall be required under this subsection (11) to register and maintain a record of each required license, power of appointment and power of attorney in the registry.  Failure to comply with this provision will subject the agent to the penalties provided in Section 83-39-29. (12)  From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law. (13)  From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section. SECTION 2.  Section 83-39-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-39-25.  (1)  A professional bail agent or his or her agent shall charge and collect for his or her premium, commission, or fee an amount of ten percent (10%) of the amount of bail per bond posted by him or her, or One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), whichever is greater, except on a bond on a defendant who is charged with a capital offense, or on a defendant who resides outside the State of Mississippi, in which case the premium, commission or fee shall be fifteen percent (15%) of the amount of bail, per bond posted by him or her, or One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), whichever is greater. (2)  A professional bail agent or his or her agent shall also charge an additional Fifty Dollars ($50.00) processing fee on each bond issued by him. (3)  Nothing herein shall prohibit a professional bail agent or his or her agent from holding collateral or taking a security interest in collateral for the purpose of insuring the payment of the premium of the bond posted or indemnifying the professional bail agent for losses incurred due to a forfeiture of a bond or the costs of apprehension and surrender of the principal. (4)  Any fee charged by a professional bail agent or his or her agent for court-approved electronic monitoring or drug testing shall not be considered part of the premium, commission or fee charged under this section.  Credit card transaction fees, bond transfer fees and any other fees authorized by law or regulation shall not be considered part of the premium, commission or fee charged under this section. SECTION 3.  Section 99-5-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-5-9.  (1)  In addition to any type of bail allowed by statute, any committing court, in its discretion, may allow any defendant, to whom bail is allowable, to deposit cash as bail bond in lieu of a surety or property bail bond, by depositing such cash sum as the court may direct with the sheriff or officer having custody of defendant, who shall receipt therefor and who shall forthwith deliver the said monies to the county treasurer, who shall receipt therefor in duplicate.  The sheriff, or other officer, upon receipt of the county treasurer, shall forthwith deliver one (1) copy of such receipt to the committing court who shall then order the release of such defendant. (2)  (a)  The order of the court shall set forth the conditions upon which such cash bond is allowed and shall be determined to be the agreement upon which the bailee defendant has agreed. (b)  Any court may authorize a defendant to post a cash deposit no less than ten percent (10%) of the total bail amount in lieu of a surety or property bond, only if the defendant: (i)  Meets all of the conditions set out in the Mississippi Rules of Criminal Procedures; and (ii)  Executes a sworn affidavit affirming such eligibility. (3)  The sums received by the county treasurer shall be deposited by him in a special fund to be known as "Cash Bail Fund," and shall be received by him subject to the terms and conditions of the order of the court. (4)  If the committing court authorizes bail by a cash deposit under subsection (1) of this section, but anyone authorized to release a criminal defendant allows the deposit of an amount less than the full amount of the bail ordered by the court, the clerk of the court shall, prior to accepting any bail payment from the defendant, provide the defendant with written notice as prescribed in subsection (5) of this section.  After acknowledging receipt of such notice in writing, the defendant may post bail by a professional bail agent in an amount equal to one-fourth (1/4) of the full amount fixed under subsection (1) or the amount of the actual deposit whichever is greater. (5)  The clerk of the court shall provide written notice to the defendant of his or her options in posting bail, using the form prescribed in the Mississippi Rules of Criminal Procedure or the form prescribed in subsection (6) of this section if the Rules do not prescribe a substantially identical form.  The notice shall be provided in a clear and conspicuous manner, and the defendant shall sign an acknowledgment of receipt before making any bail payment. (6)  The notice form required under subsection (5) of this section shall be substantially in the following form: "STATUTORY FORM (As prescribed in Section 99-5-9(6)) NOTICE OF BAIL OPTIONS Section 99-5-9, Mississippi Code of 1972 To: ______________________________ (Defendant's Name) Case Number:  _____________________ Court: ___________________________ IMPORTANT NOTICE REGARDING YOUR BAIL OPTIONS The court has set your bail in the amount of $_______________.  You have been informed that you may deposit a lesser amount of $_______________ as cash bail. "YOU HAVE THE FOLLOWING OPTIONS FOR POSTING BAIL: Option 1: Cash Bail You may deposit $_______________ in cash with the court. Option 2: Professional Bail Agent Under Mississippi law, you may post bail through a professional bail agent (bail bondsman).  The bail agent will post a bond in an amount equal to one-fourth (1/4) of the full bail amount set by the court OR the amount of the reduced cash deposit allowed, whichever is GREATER. IMPORTANT:  When using a bail agent, you will typically pay a non-refundable premium of ten percent (10%) of the amount of bail plus Fifty Dollars ($50.00) per bond charge with a minimum fee of One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00) for Mississippi residents.  A premium of fifteen percent (15%) is charged to out-of-state residents plus Fifty Dollars ($50.00) per bond charge.  You do NOT pay the full bond amount to the bail agent.  In some instances, the bail agent may require additional security.  You should consult with an approved bail agent for specifics in this regard. In your case: Full bail amount:  $_______________ One-fourth (1/4) of full bail amount:  $_______________ Reduced cash deposit amount: $_______________ Bond amount through bail agent:  $_______________ Estimated premium you would pay to bail agent: $_______________ (Mississippi residents) $_______________ (out-of-state residents) NOTE:  The bail agent's premium is typically non-refundable, even if your case is dismissed or you are found not guilty.  If you choose to use a professional bail agent, you will need to contact a licensed bail agent directly.  You should discuss all terms, conditions, fees and collateral requirements with the bail agent before entering into any agreement. YOU MUST MAKE YOUR CHOICE BEFORE POSTING BAIL. ACKNOWLEDGMENT OF RECEIPT I acknowledge that I have received this notice and understand my bail options as explained above.  I understand that I have the right to post bail either by cash deposit or through a professional bail agent as described in this notice. ______________________________     Date: _______________ Defendant Signature ______________________________     Date: _______________ Clerk of Court" SECTION 4. (1)  As used in this section, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Bail-restricted offense" means any offense for which the punishment may include imprisonment in excess of one (1) year. (b)  "Unsecured judicial release" means any release that does not require the posting of a monetary bond, property or other security and that is: (i)  On a person's own recognizance; or (ii)  For the purpose of entering a pretrial release program, pretrial diversion program, or similar intervention program. (2)  No person charged with a bail-restricted offense shall be eligible for release by any judge on an unsecured judicial release.  Such persons charged with a bail-restricted offense shall only be eligible for release through the use of secured monetary bond, property bond or professional surety bond. (3)  Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, and in addition to other laws regarding the release of an accused person, the judge of any court having jurisdiction over a person charged with committing an offense against the criminal laws of this state shall have authority, in his or her sound discretion and in appropriate cases, to authorize the release of the person on an unsecured judicial release unless such person is charged with a bail-restricted offense. SECTION 5. (1)  No more than three (3) cash bonds may be posted per year by any individual, corporation, organization, charity, nonprofit corporation or group in any jurisdiction within the State of Mississippi. (2)  Every individual, corporation, organization, charity, nonprofit corporation or group that purports to be a charitable bail fund with the purpose of soliciting donations to use for securing the release of accused persons shall be required to submit to the same requirements as any professional surety company, including registration, licensing and regulatory oversight as established by law. (3)  The Attorney General and district attorneys shall have concurrent authority to prosecute any violation of this section. (4)  Any person or entity who violates any part of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other laws regarding the release of an accused person, no person sentenced as a repeat offender pursuant to Sections 99-19-81, 99-19-83, or any other provision of law regarding repeat offender enhancement shall be eligible for release by any judge on an unsecured judicial release.  If such person is released, such release shall only be through the use of secured monetary bond, property bond, or professional surety bond. SECTION 7. The court may assess the cost of any service of process of a bail agent either by personal service or by certified mail against the defendant in any criminal case where such service is issued by the court. SECTION 8.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.